Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201279-1193
Recipient of bridge program grant;
collect and provide data.

A recipient of a bridge program grant under section 79-1191
shall collect and provide to the department data illustrating the outcomes
of participants, including:

(1)
Participants' education levels, income, and employment status upon entry into
the bridge program;

(2) The total number of participants beginning
the bridge program, earning college credit, earning industry-recognized credentials,
and earning recognized postsecondary educational credentials;

(3)
The employment rates of participants six months, twelve months, and twenty-four
months after leaving the bridge program; and

(4) The number
of participants pursuing additional education six months, twelve months, and
twenty-four months after leaving the bridge program.

Laws 2012, LB1079, § 5.
April 7, 2012June 30, 2015